Tennessee, session 114, HB0204.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-1-806, is amended by deleting
"On or before March 1" and substituting "On or before January 15".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0204
001297
- 1 -